Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 4. Vermont Council on Domestic Violence

§ 1171.
Creation of Vermont Council on Domestic Violence.

There is created the Vermont Council on Domestic Violence. The Council shall provide leadership for Vermont’s statewide effort to eradicate domestic violence.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 1172.
Purpose; powers; duties.

The Council shall:

facilitate opportunities for dialogue, advocacy, education, and support among State agencies, advocacy groups, and the public;

collect, review, and analyze data and information relating to domestic violence;

provide assistance in developing effective responses to domestic violence, including model policies and procedures, prevention and education initiatives, and domestic-violence-related programs for the criminal justice and human services sectors; specifically, the Council shall work with the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs and the Department of Corrections to develop recommendations for practice in evidence-based prosecution, risk assessment with domestic violence offenders, the use of deferred sentences in domestic violence cases, standardized probation conditions for domestic violence offenders, appropriate programming options for domestic violence offenders, and strategies for addressing victims of domestic violence who commit crimes as a result of the coercion of a batterer;

recommend changes in State programs, laws, administrative regulations, policies, and budgets related to domestic violence;

establish and maintain standards for intervention programs for perpetrators of domestic violence, and develop a process for certifying that programs are complying with the standards;

review and comment upon legislation relating to domestic violence introduced in the General Assembly at the request of any member of the General Assembly or on its own initiative; and

study the issue of employment discrimination against victims of domestic violence and suggest model workplace protections and policies.

The Council shall collaborate with the Vermont Fatality Review Commission to develop strategies for implementing the Commission’s recommendations.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 14; amended

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 1173.
Composition and meetings.

The Council shall consist of the following members to be appointed as follows:

To be appointed by the Governor:

one member of the public who shall be a survivor of domestic violence;

a representative from the same-sex domestic violence service provider community;

a representative from the service provider community for people who are deaf or have disabilities;

a representative from the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs;

a prosecutor from one of the STOP Domestic Violence units;

a member of the Vermont clergy; and

one member of the public representing the interests of children exposed to domestic violence.

To be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court:

five members of the judiciary, one of whom may be a magistrate, one of whom may be an assistant judge, and one of whom may be a court manager;

one guardian ad litem;

a representative of Vermont Legal Aid; and

a representative of the Vermont Bar experienced in family law.

The following members:

the Secretary of Human Services or designee;

the Director of the Vermont Crime Information Center or designee;

the Defender General or designee;

the Attorney General or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services or designee;

the Director of the Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence or designee;

the Executive Director of the Criminal Justice Training Council or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Commission on Women or designee;

a representative from each county domestic violence task force;

a representative from Vermont’s Supervised Visitation Coalition;

a representative from the Vermont Police Chiefs’ Association;

a representative from the Vermont Sheriffs’ Association;

a representative from the Vermont Coalition of Batterer Intervention Services;

the Commissioner for Children and Families or designee;

the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;

the Commissioner of Corrections or designee; and

the Secretary of Education or designee.

The Council may establish any committees necessary to carry out its duties.

The Council shall meet at least quarterly to conduct its business.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 14; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 255, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 71;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 81.